District of Columbia statutes.
7-2271.07

Report to the Mayor, Council, and the public.

The Commission shall report on an annual basis to the Mayor and Council on the work of the Commission and areas of the Homeland Security Program in need of improvement and shall make the annual report available to the public.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 207, 54 DCR 794
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 157(c), 56 DCR 1117

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction.